Louisiana, session 2026, HB680.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:20, 33, 2041, 2056, 2061(2), 2062(2) and (4), 2063(A)(1),
2065(A)(4), (7), and (8), 2091, and 2191 are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
23:2062(5) and (6) and 2065.1 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§20. State and local planning process; local workforce development boards;
Transition Advisory Team
A. The secretary shall design and implement a state and local planning
process for workforce training and services, including the certification of
business/career solution centers and the chartering of local workforce development
boards, provided through the programs under the jurisdiction of the office of
workforce development workforce system planning process consistent with the
Page 1 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 680 ENROLLED
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, 29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq., and to
the extent allowed by federal law or approved federal waiver. The planning process
may include statewide, regional, or other governance or service delivery structures
as designated by the governor, including the certification of one-stop centers and,
when applicable, the establishment, oversight, consolidation, or restructuring of local
workforce development boards or successor governance entities. The planning
process shall require meaningful consultation with and participation from local
workforce development partners and employers, chief elected officials, and regional
stakeholders in the development, implementation, and modification of such plans.
B.(1) There is hereby created a Transition Advisory Team herein referred to
as the "team", which shall advise Louisiana Works throughout the planning process.
(2) The team shall be comprised of the following members:
(a) The secretary of Louisiana Works.
(b) Two local elected officials appointed by the Police Jury Association of
Louisiana.
(c) Two employers appointed by the secretary of Louisiana Works.
(d) An appointee of the Louisiana Community and Technical College
System.
(e) An appointee of Louisiana Economic Development.
(f) An appointee from the Louisiana AFL-CIO.
(g) Workforce Stakeholder appointed by the secretary of Louisiana Works.
§33. Administration funding
A. Unless superseded by federal law, the commission may use an amount not
to exceed twenty percent of the amount of funds available to the commission for
workforce training and services to implement state-level responsibilities, including
administration, research and planning, system design and development, and training
and technical assistance. Unless otherwise provided by federal law, Louisiana
Works may reserve and expend funds for state-level administration, planning,
research, system design and development, performance management, oversight,
Page 2 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 680 ENROLLED
technical assistance, and other statewide workforce system responsibilities in
amounts consistent with federal requirements and approved waivers.
B. The governor may designate Louisiana Works to act as the fiscal agent
for grant funds associated with the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of
2014, 29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq., and to the extent allowed by federal law or approved
federal waiver.
C. In the allocation and expenditure of workforce funds, Louisiana Works
shall establish a formal process for meaningful consultation with local workforce
partners and employers to ensure that funding decisions reflect regional labor market
conditions, employer needs, and workforce priorities.
D. It is the intent of the legislature that any modernization of the workforce
development system preserves meaningful local input, regional responsiveness, and
the engagement of local workforce development partners and employers, chief
elected officials, and community stakeholders in decisionmaking processes.
* * *
§2041. Legislative declaration; intent
A. The legislature hereby declares:
(1) That the existing vocational, technical, basic and remedial education,
support services, employment, and job training programs systems lack statewide
coordination and that this lack of statewide coordination makes it difficult to
ascertain duplication of services and program impact, and more importantly, does not
allow for a serious analysis to determine the responsiveness of the system in meeting
the needs of both employers and individuals in need of program services.
(2) That global economics and technological forces are creating a new
knowledge-intensive economy that requires a highly adaptable and better educated
workforce. Yet, too many Louisiana citizens are not prepared for the skill
requirements of the workplace. Too many problems persist among our human
resources that suggest a growing gap between the skills employers need and the
skills both new and experienced workers bring to the labor market. These problems
include an unacceptable number of high school drop-outs, high school graduates who
Page 3 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 680 ENROLLED
show serious skill deficiencies, and adults who are unemployed, are underemployed,
or face dislocation in the future because of illiteracy or inadequate basic skills.
(3) That the education and skill level of our human resources are the
foundation of our economic prosperity and a means by which we can increase
productivity, raise our standard of living, and lift our poor out of poverty.
B. The legislature hereby finds all of the following:
(1) That this state is experiencing sustained economic growth and increased
demand for skilled workers across multiple industries, and, as such, requires a
workforce development system that is capable of operating at scale and responding
quickly to labor market needs.
(2) Act No. 330 of the 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature strengthened
workforce governance by reinforcing Louisiana Works' role in statewide strategic
planning, regional coordination, and system alignment, while promoting greater
accountability and performance across workforce programs.
(3) The current structure of multiple local workforce development areas
results in duplicative administrative costs, fragmented customer service, reduced
oversight, and lower investments in direct training and employment services.
(4) Federal law permits states to request waivers and administrative
flexibilities pursuant to the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act to improve
efficiency, accountability, and outcomes for workers and employers.
C. It is the intent of the legislature to authorize and require Louisiana Works
to pursue federal waivers and administrative flexibilities necessary to modernize the
state's workforce development system, reduce unnecessary administrative overhead,
maximize the share of workforce resources dedicated to direct services and
employer-driven strategies, and implement a unified, statewide planning,
performance, and accountability framework that prioritizes measurable employment
outcomes, employer engagement, and responsible stewardship of federal and state
workforce development funds.
* * *
Page 4 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 680 ENROLLED
§2056. Executive organization
For the purposes of executive branch organization, the council is placed
within the executive office of the secretary office of management and finance under
the purview of the secretary of Louisiana Works pursuant to R.S. 36:301(C)(1).
§2061. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the meaning herein
ascribed to them:
* * *
(2)(a) "Board" means a local the entity designated by the governor to carry
out workforce development board as described in functions pursuant to the
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, 29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq. or such
successor entity as may be established by or pursuant to federal law, which may
include a local workforce development board, the state workforce development
board, a regional body, or another entity authorized to perform such functions.
(b) Any alternative entity designed by the governor shall include
representation from local workforce development partners and employers, or their
successors. However, such representation shall not eliminate required local
stakeholder participation.
* * *
§2062. Goals
The goals of the council are:
* * *
(2) To advocate for the development of an integrated workforce development
delivery system that provides competitive quality services addressing the needs of
businesses and workers in Louisiana To establish a unified statewide planning,
performance, and accountability framework to ensure consistent service delivery and
standards across regions.
* * *
Page 5 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 680 ENROLLED
(4) To ensure the equitable distribution of quality education, training, and
employment services statewide, especially to distressed and rural areas and areas
serving the economically disadvantaged citizens of this state To allocate and
administer workforce funds in order to prioritize measurable employment outcomes,
employment engagement, and efficient use of state and federal resources while
preserving meaningful regional input.
(5) To establish a unified and statewide planning, performance, and
accountability framework that incorporates formal input from local workforce
development partners and employers and regional stakeholders.
(6) To allocate and administer workforce funds while ensuring ongoing
meaningful consultation with local workforce development partners and employers
and preserving meaningful regional input and decisionmaking authority.
§2063. Strategic plan
A.(1) The council shall develop, prepare, adopt, and submit to the governor
a comprehensive state combined plan that establishes strategic goals, objectives, and
measures that provide direction for the provision of services and coordination of
resources by the state's workforce development delivery system. The plan shall
establish benchmarks for each measure and shall provide recommended strategies
for implementation by state agencies and private entities, and shall include
documented meaningful input from local workforce development partners and
employers, including regional plans, priorities, and performance data. The combined
plan shall be updated on a biennial basis. The state plan, which shall also serve as
the regional plan, shall be developed and updated in accordance with the Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, 29 U.S.C. 3101, et. seq., and applicable
federal regulations.
* * *
§2065. Council duties and functions
A. The council shall:
* * *
Page 6 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 680 ENROLLED
(4) Recommend to the governor the geographic designation, redesignation,
consolidation, or restructuring of workforce development areas, planning regions, or
other governance or service delivery structures for the delivery administration of
workforce development services funded through the federal Workforce Innovation
and Opportunity Act of 2014, 29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq.
* * *
(7) Assist the department in requesting developing and submitting requests
for federal waivers allowed under authorized pursuant to the federal Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, 29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq, and applicable
federal regulations, for the purpose of modernizing and improving the administration
of the state's workforce development system, including but not limited to waivers
that would do any of the following:
(a) Authorize the Workforce Investment Council to carry out a coordinated,
statewide workforce system with state directed strategy, reduction of administrative
duplication, fiscal oversight, and a single statewide one-stop operation framework
which shall be delivered by local workforce development partners and employers.
(b) Eliminate unnecessary administrative layers, duplicative governance
structures, and prescriptive requirements that impede coordination, efficiency, or
integrated service delivery.
(c) Establish consistent performance expectations across regions to improve
accountability of workforce-related programs.
(d) Provide flexibility in the allocation, consolidation, reallocation, or
administration of workforce development funds in order to maximize the proportion
of resources directed to training, employment services, work-based learning, layoff
aversion, and employer-focused activities.
(e) Streamline planning, infrastructure funding, procurement, and service
delivery requirements to support a unified statewide workforce system consistent
with federal law.
Page 7 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 680 ENROLLED
(8) Perform all duties required by the federal Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act of 2014, 29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq., and applicable federal regulations,
for the state workforce development board, and, when authorized by federal law or
approved waiver authority, perform the duties otherwise assigned to local workforce
development boards or related governance entities. The council shall also carry out
including carrying out the federally and state-mandated duties and responsibilities
for all advisory councils, committees, or successor bodies established by under
applicable federal and state workforce development programs.
* * *
§2065.1. Annual workforce outcomes report; disaggregation by parish
A. No later than February fifteenth of each year, Louisiana Works, in
coordination with the Workforce Investment Council, shall prepare and submit a
comprehensive Annual Workforce Outcomes Report to the governor, the president
of the Senate, the speaker of the House of Representatives, the Senate Committee on
Labor and Industrial Relations, the House Committee on Labor and Industrial
Relations, the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, and the legislative auditor.
The first report required by this Section shall be submitted no later than February 15,
2027, and shall cover fiscal year 2025-2026.
B. The report shall include, at a minimum, all of the following data, reported
both statewide and disaggregated by parish of the participant's residence at the time
of program entry:
(1) The number of individuals who received workforce development services
funded in whole or in part with state or federal workforce funds, reported separately
for adults, dislocated workers, and youth.
(2) The number and percentage of program participants in unsubsidized
employment during the second and fourth quarters after program exit.
(3) Median earnings of program participants during the second quarter after
program exit.
(4) The number and percentage of participants who obtained a recognized
postsecondary credential, industry-recognized certification, or secondary school
Page 8 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 680 ENROLLED
diploma, or its recognized equivalent, during participation or within one year after
program exit.
(5) Measurable skill gains achieved by participants in education or training
programs leading to a recognized credential or employment.
(6) The effectiveness of services to employers, including employer
penetration rate, repeat employer engagement rate, and the number of work-based
learning opportunities created, including apprenticeships, on-the-job training,
internships, and incumbent worker training.
(7) Total state and federal workforce development funds expended,
categorized by direct training, direct participant services, employer-focused
activities, supportive services, and administration.
(8) Cost per participant and cost per credential attained.
(9) Outcomes for participants residing in rural parishes, economically
distressed parishes, and parishes with unemployment rates exceeding the state
average, identified separately.
C. The report shall also include year-over-year comparisons for the
preceding five fiscal years where data are available, a narrative assessment of any
significant disparities in outcomes between parishes or regions, and a description of
corrective actions undertaken or recommended to address identified disparities.
D. Louisiana Works shall publish the annual report on its official website in
both a machine-readable, open data format suitable for secondary analysis and a
summary format suitable for general public review. The underlying parish-level data
shall be published concurrently with the report and shall remain publicly accessible
for no less than ten years.
E. Not later than March fifteenth of each year following submission of the
report, the Senate Committee on Labor and Industrial Relations and the House
Committee on Labor and Industrial Relations shall each convene a public hearing to
review the report and receive testimony from Louisiana Works, local workforce
development partners and employers, chief elected officials, and the public.
Page 9 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 680 ENROLLED
F. Parish-level data required by this Section shall be de-identified and
aggregated as necessary to protect the confidentiality of individual participants,
consistent with applicable state and federal privacy laws. Where small cell sizes
would risk re-identification, data may be suppressed or combined, provided that the
report clearly identifies each instance of suppression and the reason therefor.
G. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to duplicate or replace
reporting required by the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, 29
U.S.C. 3101 et seq., or applicable federal regulations. Louisiana Works may
incorporate data elements from federal reporting to satisfy the requirements of this
Section, provided that the parish-level disaggregation required under Subsection B
of this Section is fulfilled.
H. Louisiana Works shall bear sole responsibility for compiling, analyzing,
and publishing the data required by this Section. Louisiana Works shall use data
already collected through the statewide workforce information system, participant
case management system, unemployment insurance wage records, and federal
reporting required under the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, 29
U.S.C. 3101 et seq. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to impose on any local
workforce development board, local workforce development partner, chief elected
official, parish, or municipality any new data collection, compilation, or reporting
obligation beyond that already required under applicable federal or state law.
Louisiana Works shall not condition the receipt of workforce development funds on
the submission of data or reports that duplicate information otherwise available to
Louisiana Works through existing systems.
* * *
§2091. Transfer of state advisory council responsibilities
A. The council shall perform the responsibilities assigned to the state
advisory council under the following federal laws:
(1) The Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, 29 U.S.C. 3101
et seq.
Page 10 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 680 ENROLLED
(2) The Carl D. Perkins Vocational and Applied Technology Education Act
(20 U.S.C. 2301 et seq.).
(3) The Adult Education Act (20 U.S.C. 1201 et seq.).
(4) The Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. 49 et seq.).
(5) The employment program established under Section 6(d)(4), Food Stamp
Act of 1977 (7 U.S.C. 2015(d)(4)).
(6) The National Literacy Act of 1991 (20 U.S.C. 1201 et seq.).
B. The council shall assume the responsibilities formerly exercised by the
following state advisory councils:
(1) The Louisiana Employment and Training Council.
(2) The State Council on Vocational Education.
(3) The State Occupational Information Coordinating Council.
(4) The Adult Education Advisory Council.
(5) The State Apprenticeship Council.
(6) The Governor's School-to-Work Council.
(7) The Louisiana Employment Security Advisory Council.
(8) Such other state advisory commissions or councils as the council
recommends and the governor approves.
C. Upon approval of the governor, the council may, by administrative rule,
assume the responsibilities of other state advisory councils or commissions and
perform all duties and responsibilities related to them.
* * *
§2191. Workforce development boards
A. There shall be a local workforce development board for every workforce
development area The governor may designate workforce development areas,
planning regions, or other governance or service delivery structures in accordance
with the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, 29 U.S.C. 3101 et
seq., and applicable federal law. The governor may designate one or more local
workforce development boards, authorize the state to operate as a single statewide
local workforce development area, or assign such duties to the Workforce Investment
Page 11 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 680 ENROLLED
Council or another entity as permitted by federal law or approved waivers. Pursuant
to federal law, approved federal waiver authority, or an approved state plan
modification, the governor may designate the Workforce Investment Council to
perform any or all duties otherwise assigned to local workforce development boards.
B. In making designations, redesignations, consolidations, or structural
modifications, the The governor shall designate local areas within the state after
consulting consult with the state Workforce Investment Council, chief elected
officials, and local boards, and after and provide an opportunity for public comments
from businesses, labor organizations, institutions of higher education, local officials,
including meaningful formal input from local workforce development partners and
employers, which shall be documented and considered prior to final designation
decisions, and other primary stakeholders, and the general public.
Section 2. R.S. 23:2054, 2063(A)(2) and (3), 2065(A)(9), and 2192 through 2195
are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 3. The Transition Advisory Team as required by the provisions of R.S.
23:20(B) as enacted by Section 1 of this Act shall terminate operations eighteen months after
the effective date of this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 12 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.